Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 19. The Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind.

§ 22.1-346.
Transfer of property; rights and duties of the Board of Visitors of the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind; supervision of school; appointment and removal of officers and faculty; certain funding initiatives.

All of the real estate and personal property now existing at the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind at Staunton and standing in the name of the Board of Education shall be transferred to and be under the control of the Board of Visitors of the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind. The Department of General Services shall cooperate with the Board in supervising the maintenance and repair of the real and personal property of the school.

Any gift, grant, devise or bequest made prior to July 1, 1984, to the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind at Staunton shall be held by the Board of Visitors of the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind for the school. The Board shall have the power to take, hold, receive and enjoy any gift, grant, devise or bequest made hereafter to the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind. Such gift, grant, devise or bequest shall be held for uses and purposes designated by the donor or if not designated for a specific purpose, for the general purposes of any programs of the school. The Board shall provide fiduciary administration of such funds, including investments, disbursements, accounting, and financial reporting. The Board shall also accept, execute and administer any trust in which it may have an interest under the terms of the instrument creating the trust.

The Board of Visitors of the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind shall be charged with the operational control of the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind at Staunton. In exercising this operational control, the Board shall include, in any budget recommendations to the Governor for state funding for the several school divisions which may be related to educational technology or other programs appropriate for implementation within the school, state funding for such programs to be provided to the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind. However, the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind shall not be defined as a school division for constitutional purposes. Supervision of the contracts and agreements of the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind are hereby transferred to the Board of Visitors of the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind.The Board shall provide rules and regulations for the governance of the school. The Board shall administer, supervise and direct the activities and programs of the school pursuant to the rules and regulations of the Board. The Board shall appoint the officers and employees of the school subject to the provisions of Chapter 29 (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) of Title 2.2.

History.

1984, c. 413; 1998, c. 66; 2000, c. 285; 2009, c. 210.

Cross references.

As to power and duty of the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing to cooperate with schools for the deaf, see §

51.5-112

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 149, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Virginia School for the Deaf and Blind is authorized to retain the income generated by the rental of facilities on the Staunton campus to outside entities.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 285, in the chapter heading, substituted “The Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind at Staunton and the Virginia School for the Deaf, Blind and Multi-Disabled at Hampton” for “The Virginia Schools for the Deaf and the Blind”; substituted “the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind at Staunton and the Virginia School for the Deaf, Blind and Multi-Disabled at Hampton” for “the Virginia Schools for the Deaf and the Blind” throughout the section; and substituted “the Virginia School for the Deaf, Blind and Multi-Disabled” for “the Virginia School for the Deaf and Blind” in subsections B and C.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 210 rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For note on AIDS in the public schools, see 29 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 881 (1988).

§ 22.1-346.1.
Repealed by Acts 2009, c. 210, cl. 4, effective July 1, 2009.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-346.1, which established the Advisory Commission on the Virginia Schools for the Deaf and the Blind, was enacted by Acts 1997, cc. 360, 361; and amended by Acts 2000, c. 255; 2001, cc. 667, 687; 2005, c. 758.

Acts 2009, c. 210, cl. 3, provides: “The terms to which members have been appointed to serve on the Advisory Commission on the Virginia Schools for the Deaf and the Blind, pursuant to § 22.1-346.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall expire on July 1, 2009.”

§ 22.1-346.2.
Board of Visitors of the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind established.

There is hereby established the Board of Visitors of the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind (Board of Visitors), as a policy agency in the executive branch of state government under the name of the “Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind,” for the purpose of governing the educational programs and services to deaf, blind, and multi-disabled students enrolled at the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind.

The Board of Visitors shall have a total membership of 11 members that shall consist of four legislative members and seven nonlegislative citizen members. Members shall be appointed as follows: two members of the House of Delegates, to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates in accordance with the principles of proportional representation contained in the Rules of the House of Delegates; two members of the Senate, to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; and seven nonlegislative citizen members, of whom one shall be a parent of a child who is deaf or blind representing the Eastern region of the Commonwealth, one shall be a parent of a child who is deaf or blind representing the Western region of the Commonwealth, and one shall be a representative of the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind Alumni Association, to be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. Nonlegislative citizen members of the Board of Visitors shall be citizens of the Commonwealth. Legislative members of the Board of Visitors shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. After the initial staggering of terms, nonlegislative members appointed shall serve for four-year terms. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be for the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. All members may be reappointed. However, no House member shall serve more than four consecutive two-year terms, no Senate member shall serve more than two consecutive four-year terms, and no nonlegislative member appointed by the Governor shall serve more than two consecutive four-year terms. The remainder of any term to which a member is appointed to fill a vacancy shall not constitute a term in determining the member’s eligibility for reappointment.

The Board of Visitors shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership. The Board of Visitors shall elect a secretary, who shall keep an accurate record of the proceedings of the Board of Visitors and of the executive committee if one is created by the Board of Visitors, and such other officers as the Board deems appropriate. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. The Board of Visitors shall meet no more than four times each year. The meetings of the Board of Visitors shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request.

Legislative members of the Board of Visitors shall receive such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12, and nonlegislative citizen members shall receive such compensation for the performance of their duties as provided in §

2.2-2813

. All members shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. Funding for the costs of expenses of the members shall be provided from such funds as may be appropriated to the Board of Visitors, in accordance with the appropriations act.

The Superintendent shall designate a member of the staff of the Department to serve as a consultant to the Board of Visitors on matters pertaining to instruction, federal and state special education requirements, and school accreditation, and to provide technical assistance to assist the Board of Visitors in meeting specific instructional and school accreditation needs.

The Board of Visitors shall have the following powers and duties:

Establish such rules, policies, and regulations for the governance of the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind.

Prescribe the criteria and procedures governing admissions to the school, and the review of student placement, to ensure the appropriateness of the placement and instructional program of each student admitted to the school, pursuant to § 22.1-348 and in accordance with federal and state special education laws and regulations.

Establish a policy governing the transportation of students at the school to permit frequent home visits by students, and to provide to each student transportation to and from the school and the place of residence of such student’s parent or guardian whenever the school is officially closed.

Prescribe and approve the education programs of the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind, in consultation with the Department, the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing, and the Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired.

Appoint the superintendent, other officers, and the faculty of the school. The superintendent shall be appointed every two years and the other officers and faculty annually. However, the superintendent, with the approval of the chairman of the Board of Visitors, shall be authorized to fill vacancies in positions appointed by the Board of Visitors occurring between meetings of the Board of Visitors. The Board of Visitors may remove at any time the superintendent, other officers, faculty, and employees for cause, subject to the provisions of Chapter 29 (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) of Title 2.2.

Establish the qualifications, duties, and compensation of the superintendent, other officers, faculty, and employees of the school.

Prepare and submit to the Governor and the General Assembly an annual report detailing the curricula and other educational programs and services of the school, including receipts and disbursements pertaining to the operation of the school for each fiscal year ending on June 30.

History.

2009, c. 210; 2011, cc. 691, 714; 2022, c. 355.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 210, cl. 2, provides: “That the initial appointments of nonlegislative citizen members shall be staggered as follows: three nonlegislative citizen members for terms of four years, two nonlegislative citizen members for terms of three years, and two nonlegislative citizen members for terms of two years, to be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. Thereafter, appointments shall be for terms of four years.”

Acts 2011, cc. 691 and 714, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act providing for (i) staggered terms for board, council, or commission members and (ii) two-year terms for chairmen appointed by the Governor shall not affect current members or chairmen whose terms have not expired as of July 1, 2011.”

Acts
2022, c. 389, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind shall consult with the Virginia Information Technologies Agency to develop a plan to independently provide information technology support for the school. Such plan shall address anticipated cost savings, additional costs, equipment replacement, information security, and other appropriate matters. Such plan shall be submitted to the Board of Visitors of the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind no later than October 1, 2022.”

Acts 2022, c. 389, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind shall consult with the Virginia Information Technologies Agency to develop a plan to independently provide information technology support for the school. Such plan shall address anticipated cost savings, additional costs, equipment replacement, information security, and other appropriate matters. Such plan shall be submitted to the Board of Visitors of the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind no later than October 1, 2022.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 691 and 714 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “of a child who is deaf or blind representing” for ”representative from” twice in the second sentence.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 inserted “of Visitors” throughout except in subsection A in the first occurrence, in subsection B in the second paragraph in the fifth occurrence, in subsection C in the second occurrence, and in subsection D in the first occurrence; in subsections C and D, deleted “of the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind” following “to the Board of Visitors”; deleted “of Public Instruction” following “Superintendent” in subsection D; substituted “Department, the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing, and the Department for the Blind and Vision Impaired” for “Department of Education, the Virginia Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing, and the Virginia Department for the Blind and Visually Impaired” in subdivision E 4; substituted “and the General Assembly” for “and General Assembly, beginning July 1, 2010” in subdivision E 7; and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For article “Legislators on Executive-Branch Boards Are Unconstitutional, Period,” see 28 Wm. & Mary Bill of Rts. J. 1 (2019).

§ 22.1-347.
Repealed by Acts 2009, c. 210, cl. 4.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-347, providing that Superintendent of Public Instruction to prescribe curricula, reporting provisions, and transportation of students, was enacted by Acts 1984, c. 413.

§ 22.1-348.
Persons eligible; fees; educational programs to be provided; admissions procedures.

Persons from birth through age 21 shall be eligible for educational services provided by the school. The Department of Education shall be entitled to deduct annually from the locality’s share for the education of pupils with disabilities a sum equal to the actual local expenditure per pupil in support of those students placed by the relevant local school division in the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind. The amount of the actual transfers shall be based on data accumulated during the prior school year. Fees for student activities may be charged at the Board’s discretion.

From such funds as may be appropriated, the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind shall provide an educational program for children in preschool through grade twelve who are deaf, blind, or who may have sensory impairments and other disabilities, including intellectual disabilities.The Board, from time to time, may approve additional programs as may be appropriate.

The Board shall prescribe procedures and criteria for determining admission to and the appropriate placement in the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind. The appropriateness of the placement of each student attending the school shall be reviewed at least annually.

History.

1984, c. 413; 1993, c. 2; 1994, c. 259; 1999, cc. 427, 428; 2000, c. 285; 2009, c. 210; 2010, c. 666.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 666, cl. 2, provides: “That any additional fiscal impact pursuant to the provisions of this act shall be funded from existing appropriations to the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 427 rewrote the former first paragraph of subsection B, which read: “The Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind at Staunton shall provide an educational program for children who are deaf from preschool through grade twelve and an educational program for children who are blind from preschool through grade twelve. The Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind at Hampton shall provide an educational program for children who are deaf from preschool through grade twelve, an educational program for children who are blind from preschool through grade twelve, and an educational program for children with sensory-impaired multiple disabilities from preschool through grade twelve.”

The 1999 amendment by c. 428 also rewrote the former first paragraph of subsection B; in subsection C, deleted the former first sentence, which read: “The Board may establish geographic attendance zones to determine the school each student shall attend,” and in the last paragraph of subsection C, deleted the former subsection D designator, and inserted “and the appropriate placement in.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 285 substituted “the Virginia School for the Deaf, Blind and Multi-Disabled at Hampton” for “the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind at Hampton” throughout the section; and substituted “the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind at Staunton
or the Virginia School for the Deaf, Blind and Multi-Disabled at Hampton” for “the Virginia Schools for the Deaf and Blind” in subsection A.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 210 rewrote the section.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 666 substituted “from birth through age 21” for “of ages two through twenty-one” in subsection A.

§ 22.1-349.
Terms of employment of teachers.

For the purpose of retirement and other statutory benefits, teachers employed as full-time instructional personnel by the Board shall be deemed to be full-time state personnel and shall receive the same benefits as are accorded all other full-time state personnel. The Board shall require the teachers at the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind to comply with the provisions of §§ 22.1-298.1, 22.1-299, and 22.1-303. Contracts for the employment of teachers shall be in the form prescribed by the school board of the school division in which the school is located. In cases of nonrenewal of contracts of probationary teachers, the decisions shall be appealable to the Board. For all other purposes, the Virginia Personnel Act (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) shall apply to the teachers of the Virginia School for the Deaf and the Blind.

The Board shall establish salary schedules for all professional personnel which are competitive with those in effect for the school divisions in which the facility is located.

History.

1984, c. 413; 1993, c. 2; 2006, cc. 27, 349; 2009, c. 210.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 66, cl. 2 substituted reference to the Division of Human Resource Management for reference to the Division of Personnel and Training in this section.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 27 and 349 are identical, and substituted “22.1-298.1” for “22.1-298” in the second sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 210 rewrote the section.